Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-266
Board of Educational Lands and Funds; authority to sell personal property.

The state Board of Educational Lands and Funds may sell, at either public or private sale, and convert into money, articles of personal property acquired by the common school fund through bequest, gift, escheat or forfeiture to the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1943, c. 155, § 1, p. 565;

R.S.1943, § 72-266.